Washington statutes.
RCW 35.42.020

Building defined.

The term "building" as used in RCW 35.42.010 through 35.42.090 shall be construed to mean any building or buildings used as a part of, or in connection with, the operation of a city or town, and shall include the site and appurtenances, including but not limited to, heating facilities, water supply, sewage disposal, landscaping, walks, and drives.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.42.020. Prior: 1959 c 80 s 2.]